Washington statutes.
RCW 43.348.050

Independent expert scientific review and advisory committee—Created—Grant proposal evaluations and recommendations.

(1) In addition to any advisory boards the endowment determines to establish, the endowment must establish one or more independent expert scientific review and advisory committees for the purposes of evaluating grant proposals for cancer research and recommending grants to be made from the Andy Hill cancer research fund; advising the endowment during the development and review of its strategic plans for cancer research; and advising the endowment on scientific and other matters in furtherance of the cancer research purposes of this chapter.

(2) Each independent expert scientific review and advisory committee must consist of individuals with nationally recognized expertise in the scientific, clinical, ethical, commercial, and regulatory aspects of cancer research, prevention, and care. The board must appoint the members of the committee. Preliminary review of grant proposals may be made by a panel of such committee or an independent contractor chosen by the board upon recommendation of the committee, but all recommendations for grants to be made from the fund may be made only upon majority vote of the committee.

[ 2018 c 4 s 5; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 34 s 6.]